Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6241.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 70a. (1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, if a member of a township board is absent from more than 50% of regular meetings held under section 72a, measured at any point in a 12-month period, the member is subject to removal from office for willful neglect of duty as provided under section 369 of the Michigan election law, 1954 PA 116, MCL 168.369. (2) For the purposes of this section, only meetings designated as regular meetings before the beginning of the calendar year, or meetings added under an existing charter, ordinance, or statute, count toward the attendance requirements under subsection (1). (3) For the purposes of this section, a township board member is not considered absent if the board member is not present at a regular meeting due to military service, a temporary medical condition supported by written documentation signed by a licensed medical professional, or leave permitted by federal law. The board member shall submit written documentation required under this subsection to the township clerk. (4) For the purposes of this section, a township board member is not considered absent from a regular meeting if the township board determines by a majority vote at a public meeting that the board member's absence is due to an extraordinary circumstance. (5) The township clerk shall confirm receipt of the written documentation submitted by a township board member under subsection (3). The township clerk shall not determine the validity or sufficiency of the written documentation submitted by a township board member under subsection (3). A township clerk that exercises good faith to comply with this section is immune from any civil liability for any action or omission. (6) The township clerk shall provide written notice to the township board member after the board member has been absent from 40% or more of regular meetings during a 12-month period. If the township clerk has provided notice under this subsection and the board member is subject to removal under subsection (1), the township clerk shall submit charges for willful neglect of duty as provided under section 369 of the Michigan election law, 1954 PA 116, MCL 168.369. (7) If a member of a township board is removed under subsection (1), a vacancy on the township board is created under section 368 of the Michigan election law, 1954 PA 116, MCL 168.368. The vacancy must be filled as provided under section 370 of the Michigan election law, 1954 PA 116, MCL 168.370. (8) As used in this section: (a) "Military service" means that term as defined in section 3185 of the revised judicature act of 1961, 1961 PA 236, MCL 600.3185. (b) "Regular meeting" means a meeting of the township board that is designated as a regular meeting under the open meetings act, 1976 PA 267, MCL 15.261 to 15.275, and required by statute, charter, or ordinance.